Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Hotels, Schools and Other Public Buildings

§ 45-11-21.
Duty of hotel and lodging house keepers to provide means of escape.

It is the duty of every keeper or proprietor of a hotel or lodging house of over two (2) stories in height to provide and securely fasten in every lodging room above the second story which has an outside window and is used for the accommodation of guests or employees, a rope or rope ladder, for the escape of the lodgers therein in case of fire, of at least one inch (1") in diameter, which shall be fastened therein as near a window as practicable, and of sufficient length to reach therefrom to the ground on the outside of the hotel or lodging house, and made of strong material and as secure against becoming inflamed as practicable. Such rope or rope ladder shall be kept in good repair and condition. In lieu of a rope or rope ladder, there may be substituted any other appliance that may be deemed of equal or greater utility by the fire department or authority having control of the fire regulations of the city or town where such hotel or lodging house is located; but such appliance shall in all cases be so constructed as to be under the control and management of any lodger.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2080; 1906, § 2264; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4631; 1930, § 4688; 1942, § 6999.

§ 45-11-23.
Duty of hotel and lodging house keeper to post notice.

Every proprietor or keeper of any hotel or lodging house of the kind mentioned in Section 45-11-21, shall post notices in every room of the hotel or lodging house required to be provided with a rope or rope ladder or other appliance, calling attention to the fact that said section has been complied with, and designating the part of such room where the rope, rope ladder, or appliance is fastened, with general directions for its use.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2081; 1906, § 2265; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4632; 1930, § 4689; 1942, § 7000.

§ 45-11-25.
Certain hotels and lodging houses to be provided with iron balconies and stairs.

Every hotel or lodging house over two (2) stories in height shall be provided with permanent iron balconies, with iron stairs leading from one balcony to the other, to be placed at the end of each hall in and above the second story in case the hotel or lodging house be over one hundred and fifty feet (150´) in length, and in other cases such number of balconies with stairs as may be directed by the fire department or authority having control of the fire regulations of the city or town where the hotel or lodging house is located. The balconies and iron stairs shall be constructed at the expense of the owner of the hotel or lodging house.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2082; 1906, § 2266; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4633; 1930, § 4690; 1942, § 7001.

§ 45-11-27.
Public halls, hotels shall provide stair rail.

Every public hall, opera house, hotel, lodging house, or other public building of two (2) or more stories, shall have provided to each stairway used by and for the public, a hand or side rail to protect persons in ascending or descending such stairway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2083; 1906, § 2267; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4634; 1930, § 4691; 1942, § 7002.

§ 45-11-29.
Fire detectors required for hotels and lodging houses.

All hotels or lodging houses shall be provided with a Mississippi Fire Prevention Code-approved electric fire detector with a detector on each floor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2084; 1906, § 2268; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4635; 1930, § 4692; 1942, § 7003; Laws, 2004, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 45-11-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004 ch. 379, § 3 eff July 1, 2004.

[Codes, 1892, § 2085; 1906, § 2269; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4636; 1930, § 4693; 1942, § 7004.]

§ 45-11-33.
Hotel and lodging house keepers to give alarm.

Every proprietor or keeper of a hotel or lodging house shall, in case of fire therein, give notice of the same to all guests and inmates thereof at once, and do all in his power to rescue them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2086; 1906, § 2270; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4637; 1930, § 4694; 1942, § 7005.

§ 45-11-35.
Construction requirements for hotels and lodging houses.

All hotels or lodging houses hereafter constructed over two (2) stories in height and over one hundred feet (100´) in length or breadth, shall be so constructed as to have at least two (2) flights of stairs for use of guests leading from the ground floor to the uppermost story, one (1) to be located at each end or side.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2087; 1906, § 2271; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4638; 1930, § 4695; 1942, § 7006.

§ 45-11-37.
Doors to open outwardly.

All the doors for ingress and egress to public schoolhouses, theaters, assembly rooms, halls, courthouses, churches, factories with more than twenty (20) employees, and all other buildings and places of public resort whatever, where people are wont to assemble, excepting schoolhouses, courthouses, and churches of one (1) audience room, and that on the ground floor, shall be so swung as to open outwardly from the audience rooms, halls, or workshops; but such doors may be hung on double-jointed hinges, so as to open with equal ease outwardly or inwardly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4696; 1942, § 7007; Laws, 1924, ch. 283.

§ 45-11-39.
Egress in case of fire.

All school buildings, public or private, now under construction in this state or that may hereafter be constructed, shall be so constructed or so equipped as to afford ample and easy egress in case of fire.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4697; 1942, § 7008; Laws, 1924, ch. 290.

§ 45-11-41.
School buildings to have certain fire escapes.

In the construction of school buildings all outside doors shall be made to open outwardly. All buildings of two (2) or more stories in height shall be constructed so as to give easy escape in case of fire, by providing modern fire escapes, or by providing iron ladders, slides or stairways on the outside of such buildings. In case of ladders, slides or stairways on the outside, sufficient platform room at the top of such ladder, slide or stairway and sufficient banisters or railings shall be provided to guarantee the safety of the children in getting out of the building. Provided, however, that in any fireproof school buildings with each floor on the ground level and constructed for more than ten (10) years, the board of trustees of the school or attendance center, in their discretion, may not be required to add fire escapes provided within sixty (60) days immediately following the passage of this section they spread upon their minutes a resolution to that effect.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4698; 1942, § 7009; Laws, 1924, ch. 290; Laws, 1964, ch. 417, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 45-11-43.
County superintendent to furnish plans and approve construction.

The county superintendent of education in each county shall furnish plans and specifications for the fire escape facilities for each school building constructed, a copy of which shall be furnished the trustees of the district in which the new building is being constructed and a copy shall be placed on file in the office of the county superintendent of education. When the building is completed the trustees shall notify the county superintendent, who shall make a personal inspection of the new building and if the plans and specifications have been complied with he shall so report to the trustees and such notification and approval shall be made of record in his office. The school building shall not be opened for the reception of pupils until the county superintendent has approved the fire escape facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4699; 1942, § 7010; Laws, 1924, ch. 290.

§ 45-11-45.
Places of public amusement; how constructed.

Every place for public amusement shall have at least the following arrangements for the safety of those attending there: The seats shall be located in rows with spaces between the seats adequate for easy ingress and egress, and an aisle of at least four (4) feet in width shall run between the rows on the lowest floor, if there be more than one (1) floor, from the commencement of the seats toward the place of performance, exhibition, or speaking, as far as the seats are located, and, if there be only one (1) floor, then between the rows on that floor, and also an aisle of at least three (3) feet in width shall be made to run along the outward ends of the rows of seats and next to the walls, and also around or along the ends of all rows of seats wherever located; and all aisles shall be kept unobstructed towards places of egress. All seats shall be located in rows, to which the aisles shall conform. There shall be as many doors for egress for those in attendance, not less than two (2) at either end or side of the building, as can be made consistently with the proper strength of the structure. All scenery shall be made as secure against becoming inflamed as reasonably practicable, and all reasonably practicable arrangements shall be made for the supply of water or other means for extinguishment of fires, and they shall be kept constantly effective during the presence of the audience. In cities of over ten thousand (10,000) inhabitants a fireproof drop curtain of sufficient dimensions to cover the entire front of the stage shall be so hung that, upon an alarm of fire originating upon, or in rear of stage, it may be promptly dropped so as to prevent the fire from communicating with the auditorium.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2089; 1906, § 2273; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4640; 1930, § 4700; 1942, § 7011.

§ 45-11-47.
Public eating places or places of public amusement to provide exits; penalties for violation.

It shall be the duty of the owner and operator of any public restaurant, cafe, night club, or eating place or place of public amusement to provide proper exits for the use of patrons in the event of fire in same. Doors to all restaurants, cafes, night clubs, or other public eating places or places of public amusement shall open to the outside of the building, where the seating capacity is over fifty (50) seats. Every room, gallery, tier or other space having a capacity of one hundred (100) or more shall have not less than two (2) exit doorways. In every establishment that accommodates three hundred (300) or more persons, each room, gallery, tier or other space where such assembly occurs, shall have exit ways to the outside as follows:

Not less than two (2) exit ways when six hundred (600) persons or less are accommodated in such room, gallery, tier or other space; and

Not less than three (3) exit ways when more than six hundred (600), but not more than one thousand (1,000) persons, are accommodated; and

Not less than four (4) exit ways when more than one thousand (1,000) persons are accommodated.

Any restaurant, cafe, night club or other public eating place or place of public amusement, consisting of two (2) or more stories or floors, or any restaurant, cafe, night club, or public eating place or place of public amusement, being situated above or higher than the ground floor of any building, when such upper or higher floor has a seating capacity for fifty (50) or more persons, shall provide at least two (2) stairways located as far apart as practical for the use of patrons in the event of fire in said building. At least one (1) of the two (2) stairways shall lead directly to the outside of such building or assembly room, and shall not lead into or through the lobby or any other place through which persons come from other parts of the building or will have to pass in making emergency exits.

Any owner of any restaurant, cafe, night club, or public eating place failing or refusing to comply with the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7011-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 347, §§ 1-3.

§ 45-11-49.
Penalties on hotel and lodging house keepers.

Every owner, lessee, keeper, or proprietor of a hotel or a lodging house who shall, when the same is prescribed by law to be done, fail, neglect or refuse:

To provide for each room a rope or rope ladder, or other like appliance; or

To give notice calling attention to such rope or rope ladder or appliance, and giving directions for its use; or

To provide iron balconies with iron stairs; or

To provide a hand or side rail to each stairway; or

To provide a Mississippi Fire Prevention Code-approved electric fire detector; or

To give alarm and awaken all guests and inmates of his house in case of fire therein or in close proximity thereto; or

To do everything in case of fire in his power to rescue the guests or inmates of his house; or

To do anything required by law to be done under the provisions of Sections 45-11-21 through 45-11-55;

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not less than ninety (90) days nor more than six (6) months, or fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2091; 1906, § 2275; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4642; 1930, § 4701; 1942, § 7012; Laws, 2004, ch. 379, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 45-11-51.
Penalty for giving public amusements in house not properly constructed.

Every person who shall give any public amusement, entertainment or exhibition in any house or place for public amusement not constructed and arranged as required by Sections 45-11-21 through 45-11-55, or shall violate or permit the violation of any of their requirements, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction, shall be fined not less than Twenty Dollars ($20.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned in the county jail not less than one (1) week nor more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2092; 1906, § 2276; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4643; 1930, § 4702; 1942, § 7013.

§ 45-11-53.
Penalty for erection of building in disregard of requirements.

Any architect, carpenter, or builder, or the owner or other person, who may hereafter erect or cause to be erected, or aid in erecting, any hotel or other house or structure for the construction of which provisions are made in Sections 45-11-21 through 45-11-55, who shall refuse or fail to comply, in the erection or construction thereof, with such provisions, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2093; 1906, § 2277; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4644; 1930, § 4703; 1942, § 7014.

§ 45-11-55.
Every day’s omission a separate offense.

Every day’s omission or failure by any person to do whatever under the provisions of Sections 45-11-21 through 45-11-55 is required to be done or provided, shall be considered and treated as a separate offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2094; 1906, § 2278; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4645; 1930, § 4704; 1942, § 7015.